Hawaii statutes.
§353G-13 Reporting and implementation;
substance abuse treatment monitoring program. (a) Every assessment
program, treatment program, correctional center or facility, and parole agency
that provides services pursuant to this chapter or that otherwise supervises a
person or issues an order pursuant to this chapter shall keep case-specific
records and aggregate data and statistics as may be required by the department
of health and which shall be required by the statewide substance abuse
treatment monitoring program under section 321-192.5. The department of public
safety shall collect data in accordance with section 321-192.5 from any
assessment program, treatment program, treatment provider, correctional center
or facility, and parole agency that provides substance abuse treatment to
persons served through public funds administered by the department of public
safety. The department of public safety shall implement sufficient protections
to ensure that the identity of a recipient of substance abuse treatment
services remains strictly confidential and that aggregate data collected
pursuant to this section is used solely for the purpose of this section.

This subsection shall not be construed to
abrogate an individual's right to privacy.

(b) The department of public safety shall
include in the contract with any treatment provider all criteria established by
the department of health pursuant to section 321-192.5 to determine whether the
treatment provider is achieving success in treating individuals with substance
abuse.

(c) The department of public safety, in
conjunction with the department of health, shall report on an annual basis to
the legislature and to the governor, its findings concerning the need for and
implementation of the various provisions of this chapter. The report shall
include information collected under subsection (a) and a synopsis of
information or data necessary to determine the impact, utility, and
cost-benefits of the provisions of this chapter.

(d) The department of public safety, in
conjunction with the department of health, shall establish an advisory board
that shall be comprised of judges, prosecutors, defense attorneys, adult
probation officials, parole officials, correctional officials, representatives
of assessment programs and treatment programs, and individuals working in
licensed alcohol and other drug abuse treatment facilities who are past
consumers of treatment services. The advisory board shall meet periodically to
discuss the provisions, implementation, and evaluation of this chapter, and to
make recommendations to the department of health.

(e) Except as provided in this chapter, all
data, information, or records kept or compiled pursuant to this section shall
be deemed to be government records for the purposes of chapter 92F. [L 1998, c
152, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 40, §27]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next